Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1547
Legislative intent.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide legal protection to insurers and insurance producers so that they have the discretion to take action to assist in detecting and preventing financial exploitation.

(2) The Legislature recognizes that insurers and insurance producers are in a unique position to potentially discover financial exploitation when conducting transactions on behalf of and at the request of their customers.

(3) The Legislature recognizes that insurers and insurance producers have duties imposed by contract and duties imposed by both federal and state law to conduct transactions requested by their customers faithfully and timely in accordance with the customer's instructions.

(4) The Legislature recognizes that insurers and insurance producers do not have a duty to contravene the valid instructions of their customers and nothing in the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation Act creates such a duty.

Laws 2026, LB967, § 17.
July 18, 2026